Tennessee, session 114, HB0831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-5-205, is amended by adding the
following at the end of subdivision (2):
Of the allocation of the tax provided to the general fund of the state, three percent (3%)
of that amount must be provided to the department of agriculture for the purposes of
supporting growth in the utilization of agricultural products of this state in brewing and in
the promotion of the growth of the brewing industry in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0831
001012
- 1 -